Utah statutes.
62A-11-604.   Notification of order to suspend or recision of order.

(1)  When, pursuant to this part, the office orders the suspension of a person's driver license, or rescinds an order suspending a person's driver license, the office shall, within five business days after the day on which the order or recision is made, notify:

(a)  the Driver License Division; and

(b)  the person to whom the order or recision applies.

(2) (a)  The notification described in Subsections (1)(a) and (b) shall include the name and identifying information of the person described in Subsection (1).

(b)  The notification to a person described in Subsection (1)(b) shall include a statement indicating that the person must reinstate the person's driver license with the Driver License Division before driving a motor vehicle.

